dictsource/ja_rules
// Japanese
//
// Copyright (C) 2017 Reece H. Dunn
//
// This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
// it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
// the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or
// (at your option) any later version.
//
// This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
// but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
// MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
// GNU General Public License for more details.
//
// You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
// along with this program; if not, see: <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

// Replacements:
// 1.  Map Katakana to Hiragana.
// 2.  Map voiced characters to their base form and voicing combined character.

.replace
	// U+3040 - U+309F	Hiragana ----------------------------
	が	が	// ga:	U+304C => U+304B U+3099
	ぎ	ぎ	// gi:	U+304E => U+304D U+3099
	ぐ	ぐ	// gu:	U+3050 => U+304F U+3099
	げ	げ	// ge:	U+3052 => U+3051 U+3099
	ご	ご	// go:	U+3054 => U+3053 U+3099
	ざ	ざ	// za:	U+3056 => U+3055 U+3099
	じ	じ	// ji:	U+3058 => U+3057 U+3099
	ず	ず	// zu:	U+305A => U+3059 U+3099
	ぜ	ぜ	// ze:	U+305C => U+305B U+3099
	ぞ	ぞ	// zo:	U+305E => U+305D U+3099
	だ	だ	// da:	U+3060 => U+305F U+3099
	ぢ	ぢ	// ji:	U+3062 => U+3061 U+3099 (obsolete)
	づ	づ	// zu:	U+3065 => U+3064 U+3099
	で	で	// de:	U+3067 => U+3066 U+3099
	ど	ど	// do:	U+3069 => U+3068 U+3099
	ば	ば	// ba:	U+3070 => U+306F U+3099
	ぱ	ぱ	// pa:	U+3071 => U+306F U+309A
	び	び	// bi:	U+3073 => U+3072 U+3099
	ぴ	ぴ	// pi:	U+3074 => U+3072 U+309A
	ぶ	ぶ	// bu:	U+3076 => U+3075 U+3099
	ぷ	ぷ	// pu:	U+3077 => U+3075 U+309A
	べ	べ	// be:	U+3079 => U+3078 U+3099
	ぺ	ぺ	// pe:	U+307A => U+3078 U+309A
	ぼ	ぼ	// bo:	U+307C => U+307B U+3099
	ぽ	ぽ	// po:	U+307D => U+307B U+309A
	ゔ	ゔ	// vu:	U+3094 => U+3046 U+3099 (obsolete)
	゛	゙		//	U+309B => U+3099
	゜	゚		//	U+309C => U+309A
	ゟ	より	//	U+309F => U+3088 U+308A (yori digraph)
	// U+30A0 - U+30FF	Katakana ----------------------------
	ァ	ぁ	// a:	U+30A1 => U+3041 (small)
	ア	あ	// a:	U+30A2 => U+3042
	ィ	ぃ	// i:	U+30A3 => U+3043 (small)
	イ	い	// i:	U+30A4 => U+3044
	ゥ	ぅ	// u:	U+30A5 => U+3045 (small)
	ウ	う	// u:	U+30A6 => U+3046
	ェ	ぇ	// e:	U+30A7 => U+3047 (small)
	エ	え	// e:	U+30A8 => U+3048
	ォ	ぉ	// o:	U+30A9 => U+3049 (small)
	オ	お	// o:	U+30AA => U+304A
	カ	か	// ka:	U+30AB => U+304B
	ガ	が	// ga:	U+30AC => U+304B U+3099
	キ	き	// ki:	U+30AD => U+304D
	ギ	ぎ	// gi:	U+30AE => U+304D U+3099
	ク	く	// ku:	U+30AF => U+304F
	グ	ぐ	// gu:	U+30B0 => U+304F U+3099
	ケ	け	// ke:	U+30B1 => U+3051
	ゲ	げ	// ge:	U+30B2 => U+3051 U+3099
	コ	こ	// ko:	U+30B3 => U+3053
	ゴ	ご	// go:	U+30B4 => U+3053 U+3099
	サ	さ	// sa:	U+30B5 => U+3055
	ザ	ざ	// za:	U+30B6 => U+3055 U+3099
	シ	し	// shi:	U+30B7 => U+3057
	ジ	じ	// ji:	U+30B8 => U+3057 U+3099
	ス	す	// su:	U+30B9 => U+3059
	ズ	ず	// zu:	U+30BA => U+3059 U+3099
	セ	せ	// se:	U+30BB => U+305B
	ゼ	ぜ	// ze:	U+30BC => U+305B U+3099
	ソ	そ	// so:	U+30BD => U+305D
	ゾ	ぞ	// zo:	U+30BE => U+305D U+3099
	タ	た	// ta:	U+30BF => U+305F
	ダ	だ	// da:	U+30C0 => U+305F U+3099
	チ	ち	// chi:	U+30C1 => U+3061
	ヂ	ぢ	// ji:	U+30C2 => U+3061 U+3099 (obsolete)
	ッ	っ	// tsu:	U+30C3 => U+3063 (small)
	ツ	つ	// tsu:	U+30C4 => U+3064
	ヅ	づ	// zu:	U+30C5 => U+3064 U+3099
	テ	て	// te:	U+30C6 => U+3066
	デ	で	// de:	U+30C7 => U+3066 U+3099
	ト	と	// to:	U+30C8 => U+3068
	ド	ど	// do:	U+30C9 => U+3068 U+3099
	ナ	な	// na:	U+30CA => U+306A
	ニ	に	// ni:	U+30CB => U+306B
	ヌ	ぬ	// nu:	U+30CC => U+306C
	ネ	ね	// ne:	U+30CD => U+306D
	ノ	の	// no:	U+30CE => U+306E
	ハ	は	// ha:  U+30CF => U+306F
	バ	ば	// ba:	U+30D0 => U+306F U+3099
	パ	ぱ	// pa:	U+30D1 => U+306F U+309A
	ヒ	ひ	// hi:	U+30D2 => U+3072
	ビ	び	// bi:	U+30D3 => U+3072 U+3099
	ピ	ぴ	// pi:	U+30D4 => U+3072 U+309A
	フ	ふ	// fu:	U+30D5 => U+3075
	ブ	ぶ	// bu:	U+30D6 => U+3075 U+3099
	プ	ぷ	// pu:	U+30D7 => U+3075 U+309A
	ヘ	へ	// he:	U+30D8 => U+3078
	ベ	べ	// be:	U+30D9 => U+3078 U+3099
	ペ	ぺ	// pe:	U+30DA => U+3078 U+309A
	ホ	ほ	// ho:	U+30DB => U+307B
	ボ	ぼ	// bo:	U+30DC => U+307B U+3099
	ポ	ぽ	// po:	U+30DD => U+307B U+309A
	マ	ま	// ma:	U+30DE => U+307E
	ミ	み	// mi:	U+30DF => U+307F
	ム	む	// mu:	U+30E0 => U+3080
	メ	め	// me:	U+30E1 => U+3081
	モ	も	// mo:	U+30E2 => U+3082
	ャ	ゃ	// ya:	U+30E3 => U+3083 (small)
	ヤ	や	// ya:	U+30E4 => U+3084
	ュ	ゅ	// yu:	U+30E5 => U+3085 (small)
	ユ	ゆ	// yu:	U+30E6 => U+3086
	ョ	ょ	// yo:	U+30E7 => U+3087 (small)
	ヨ	よ	// yo:	U+30E8 => U+3088
	ラ	ら	// ra:	U+30E9 => U+3089
	リ	り	// ri:	U+30EA => U+308A
	ル	る	// ru:	U+30EB => U+308B
	レ	れ	// re:	U+30EC => U+308C
	ロ	ろ	// ro:	U+30ED => U+308D
	ヮ	ゎ	// wa:	U+30EE => U+308E (small)
	ワ	わ	// wa:	U+30EF => U+308F
	ヰ	ゐ	// wi:	U+30F0 => U+3090
	ヱ	ゑ	// we:	U+30F1 => U+3091
	ヲ	を	// wo:	U+30F2 => U+3092
	ン	ん	// n:	U+30F3 => U+3093
	ヴ	ゔ	// vu:	U+30F4 => U+3046 U+3099 (obsolete)
	ヵ	ゕ	// ka:	U+30F5 => U+3095 (small)
	ヶ	ゖ	// ke:	U+30F6 => U+3096 (small)
	ヷ	あ゙	// va:	U+30F7 => U+3042 U+3099
	ヸ	い゙	// vi:	U+30F8 => U+3044 U+3099
	ヹ	え゙	// ve:	U+30F9 => U+3048 U+3099
	ヺ	お゙	// vo:	U+30FA => U+304A U+3099
	ヽ	ゝ	//	U+30FD => U+309D (iteration mark)
	ヾ	ゞ	//	U+30FE => U+309E (voiced iteration mark)
	ヿ	こと	//	U+30FF => U+3053 U+3068 (koto digraph)
	// U+FF65 - U+FF9F	Halfwidth Katakana
	ｦ	を	// wo:	U+FF66 => U+3092
	ｧ	ぁ	// a:	U+FF67 => U+3041 (small)
	ｨ	ぃ	// i:	U+FF68 => U+3043 (small)
	ｩ	ぅ	// u:	U+FF69 => U+3045 (small)
	ｪ	ぇ	// e:	U+FF6A => U+3047 (small)
	ｫ	ぉ	// o:	U+FF6B => U+3049 (small)
	ｬ	ゃ	// ya:	U+FF6C => U+3083 (small)
	ｭ	ゅ	// yu:	U+FF6D => U+3085 (small)
	ｮ	ょ	// yo:	U+FF6E => U+3087 (small)
	ｯ	っ	// tsu:	U+FF6F => U+3063 (small)
	ｰ	ー	//	U+FF70 => U+30FC
	ｱ	あ	// a:	U+FF71 => U+3042
	ｲ	い	// i:	U+FF72 => U+3044
	ｳ	う	// u:	U+FF73 => U+3046
	ｴ	え	// e:	U+FF74 => U+3048
	ｵ	お	// o:	U+FF75 => U+304A
	ｶ	か	// ka:	U+FF76 => U+304B
	ｷ	き	// ki:	U+FF77 => U+304D
	ｸ	く	// ku:	U+FF78 => U+304F
	ｹ	け	// ke:	U+FF79 => U+3051
	ｺ	こ	// ko:	U+FF7A => U+3053
	ｻ	さ	// sa:	U+FF7B => U+3055
	ｼ	し	// shi:	U+FF7C => U+3057
	ｽ	す	// su:	U+FF7D => U+3059
	ｾ	せ	// se:	U+FF7E => U+305B
	ｿ	そ	// so:	U+FF7F => U+305D
	ﾀ	た	// ta:	U+FF80 => U+305F
	ﾁ	ち	// chi:	U+FF81 => U+3061
	ﾂ	つ	// tsu:	U+FF82 => U+3064
	ﾃ	て	// te:	U+FF83 => U+3066
	ﾄ	と	// to:	U+FF84 => U+3068
	ﾅ	な	// na:	U+FF85 => U+306A
	ﾆ	に	// ni:	U+FF86 => U+306B
	ﾇ	ぬ	// nu:	U+FF87 => U+306C
	ﾈ	ね	// ne:	U+FF88 => U+306D
	ﾉ	の	// no:	U+FF89 => U+306E
	ﾊ	は	// ha:	U+FF8A => U+306F
	ﾋ	ひ	// hi:	U+FF8B => U+3072
	ﾌ	ふ	// fu:	U+FF8C => U+3075
	ﾍ	へ	// he:	U+FF8D => U+3078
	ﾎ	ほ	// ho:	U+FF8E => U+307B
	ﾏ	ま	// ma:	U+FF8F => U+307E
	ﾐ	み	// mi:	U+FF90 => U+307F
	ﾑ	む	// mu:	U+FF91 => U+3080
	ﾒ	め	// me:	U+FF92 => U+3081
	ﾓ	も	// mo:	U+FF93 => U+3082
	ﾔ	や	// ya:	U+FF94 => U+3084
	ﾕ	ゆ	// yu:	U+FF95 => U+3086
	ﾖ	よ	// yo:	U+FF96 => U+3088
	ﾗ	ら	// ra:	U+FF97 => U+3089
	ﾘ	り	// ri:	U+FF98 => U+308A
	ﾙ	る	// ru:	U+FF99 => U+308B
	ﾚ	れ	// re:	U+FF9A => U+308C
	ﾛ	ろ	// ro:	U+FF9B => U+308D
	ﾜ	わ	// wa:	U+FF9C => U+308F
	ﾝ	ん	// n:	U+FF9D => U+3093
	ﾞ	゙		//	U+FF9E => U+3099
	ﾟ	゚		//	U+FF9F => U+309A
	// U+1B000 - U+1B001	Kana Supplement ---------------------
	𛀀	え	// e:	U+1B000 => U+3048 (archaic)

	‐	ー	//	U+2010 => U+30FC
	‑	ー	//	U+2011 => U+30FC
	–	ー	//	U+2013 => U+30FC
	—	ー	//	U+2014 => U+30FC
	―	ー	//	U+2015 => U+30FC
	−	ー	//	U+2212 => U+30FC
	⁓	ー	//	U+2053 => U+30FC
	〜	ー	//	U+301C => U+30FC
	〰	ー	//	U+3030 => U+30FC

// Hiragana Groups -- By Starting Consonant

//	a  i  u  e  o  *
.L01	か き く け こ		// k
.L02	が ぎ ぐ げ ご		// g
.L03	さ    す せ そ 		// s
.L04	   し        		// sh
.L05	ざ    ず ぜ ぞ づ	// z
.L06	   じ          ぢ	// j
.L07	た       て と 		// t
.L08	   ち      		// ch
.L09	      つ		// ts
.L10	だ       で ど		// d
.L11	な に ぬ ね の		// n
.L12	は ひ    へ ほ		// h
.L13	      ふ		// f
.L14	ば び ぶ べ ぼ		// b
.L15	ぱ ぴ ぷ ぺ ぽ		// p
.L16	ま み む め も		// m
.L17	や    ゆ    よ		// y
.L18	ら り る れ ろ		// r
.L19	わ ゐ    ゑ を		// w
.L20	あ い う え お		// none (vowels)
.L21	ゃ    ゅ    ょ		// y (small)

// Hiragana Combining Characters

.group ゃ
	ゃ	a		// ya
	ゃぁ	a:		// yā
	ゃー	a:		// yā

.group ゅ
	ゅ	u		// yu
	ゅぅ	u:		// yū
	ゅー	u:		// yū

.group ょ
	ょ	o		// yo
	ょぉ	o:		// yō
	ょー	o:		// yō

// Hiragana

.group あ
	あ	a		// a
	ああ	a:		// ā
	あぁ	a:		// ā
	あー	a:		// ā
	あ゙	va		// va (Katakana)
	あ゙あ	va:		// vā (Katakana)
	あ゙ぁ	va:		// vā (Katakana)
	あ゙ー	va:		// vā (Katakana)

.group い
	い	i		// i
	いい	i:		// ī
	いぃ	i:		// ī
	いー	i:		// ī
	い゙	vi		// vi (Katakana)
	い゙い	vi:		// vī (Katakana)
	い゙ぃ	vi:		// vī (Katakana)
	い゙ー	vi:		// vī (Katakana)
	いぇ	je		// ye
	いぇー	je:		// yē

.group う
	う	u		// u
	うう	u:		// ū
	うぅ	u:		// ū
	うー	u:		// ū
	ゔ	vu		// vu
	ゔう	vu:		// vū
	ゔぅ	vu:		// vū
	ゔー	vu:		// vū
	ゔぁ	va		// va
	ゔぁー	va:		// vā
	ゔぃ	vi		// vi
	ゔぃー	vi:		// vī
	ゔぇ	ve		// ve
	ゔぇー	ve:		// vē
	ゔぉ	vo		// vo
	ゔぉー	vo:		// vō
	うぃ	wi		// wi
	うぃー	wi:		// wī
	うぇ	we		// we
	うぇー	we:		// wē
	うぉ	wo		// wo
	うぉー	wo:		// wō
	ゔゅ	v_ju		// vyu
	ゔゅー	v_ju:		// vyū

.group え
	え	e		// e
	ええ	e:		// ē
	えぇ	e:		// ē
	えー	e:		// ē
	え゙	ve		// ve (Katakana)
	え゙え	ve:		// vē (Katakana)
	え゙ぇ	ve:		// vē (Katakana)
	え゙ー	ve:		// vē (Katakana)

.group お
	お	o		// o
	おお	o:		// ō
	おぉ	o:		// ō
	おー	o:		// ō
	お゙	vo		// vo (Katakana)
	お゙お	vo:		// vō (Katakana)
	お゙ぉ	vo:		// vō (Katakana)
	お゙ー	vo:		// vō (Katakana)

.group か
	か	ka		// ka
	かあ	ka:		// kā
	かぁ	ka:		// kā
	かー	ka:		// kā
	が	ga		// ga
	があ	ga:		// gā
	がぁ	ga:		// gā
	がー	ga:		// gā

.group き
	き	ki		// ki
	きい	ki:		// kī
	きぃ	ki:		// kī
	きー	ki:		// kī
	き (L21	k_j		// ky([auo]
	ぎ	gi		// gi
	ぎい	gi:		// gī
	ぎぃ	gi:		// gī
	ぎー	gi:		// gī
	ぎ (L21	g_j		// gy([auo]

.group く
	く	ku		// ku
	くう	ku:		// kū
	くぅ	ku:		// kū
	くー	ku:		// kū
	ぐ	gu		// gu
	ぐう	gu:		// gū
	ぐぅ	gu:		// gū
	ぐー	gu:		// gū
	くぁ	ka		// ka
	くぁー	ka:		// kā
	くぃ	kwi		// kwi
	くぃー	kwi:		// kwī
	くぇ	kwe		// kwe
	くぇー	kwe:		// kwē
	くぉ	kwo		// kwo
	くぉー	kwo:		// kwō
	ぐぁ	ga		// ga
	ぐぁー	ga:		// gā
	ぐぃ	gwi		// gwi
	ぐぃー	gwi:		// gwī
	ぐぇ	gwe		// gwe
	ぐぇー	gwe:		// gwē
	ぐぉ	gwo		// gwo
	ぐぉー	gwo:		// gwō

.group け
	け	ke		// ke
	けえ	ke:		// kē
	けぇ	ke:		// kē
	けー	ke:		// kē
	げ	ge		// ge
	げえ	ge:		// gē
	げぇ	ge:		// gē
	げー	ge:		// gē

.group こ
	こ	ko		// ko
	こお	ko:		// kō
	こぉ	ko:		// kō
	こー	ko:		// kō
	ご	go		// go
	ごお	go:		// gō
	ごぉ	go:		// gō
	ごー	go:		// gō

.group さ
	さ	sa		// sa
	さあ	sa:		// sā
	さぁ	sa:		// sā
	さー	sa:		// sā
	ざ	za		// za
	ざあ	za:		// zā
	ざぁ	za:		// zā
	ざー	za:		// zā

.group し
	し	s\\i		// shi
	しい	s\\i:		// shī
	しぃ	s\\i:		// shī
	しー	s\\i:		// shī
	し (L21	s\\		// sh([auo]
	じ	d_z\\i		// ji
	じい	d_z\\i:		// jī
	じぃ	d_z\\i:		// jī
	じー	d_z\\i:		// jī
	じ (L21	d_z\\		// j([auo]
	しぇ	s\\e		// she
	しぇー	s\\e:		// shē
	じぇ	d_z\\e		// je
	じぇー	d_z\\e:		// jē

.group す
	す	su		// su
	すう	su:		// sū
	すぅ	su:		// sū
	すー	su:		// sū
	ず	zu		// zu
	ずう	zu:		// zū
	ずぅ	zu:		// zū
	ずー	zu:		// zū

.group せ
	せ	se		// se
	せえ	se:		// sē
	せぇ	se:		// sē
	せー	se:		// sē
	ぜ	ze		// ze
	ぜえ	ze:		// zē
	ぜぇ	ze:		// zē
	ぜー	ze:		// zē

.group そ
	そ	so		// so
	そお	so:		// sō
	そぉ	so:		// sō
	そー	so:		// sō
	ぞ	zo		// zo
	ぞお	zo:		// zō
	ぞぉ	zo:		// zō
	ぞー	zo:		// zō

.group た
	た	ta		// ta
	たあ	ta:		// tā
	たぁ	ta:		// tā
	たー	ta:		// tā
	だ	da		// da
	だあ	da:		// dā
	だぁ	da:		// dā
	だー	da:		// dā

.group ち
	ち	t_s\\i		// chi
	ちい	t_s\\i:		// chī
	ちぃ	t_s\\i:		// chī
	ちー	t_s\\i:		// chī
	ち (L21	t_s\\		// ch([auo]
	ぢ	d_z\\i		// ji		(obsolete)
	ぢい	d_z\\i:		// jī		(obsolete)
	ぢぃ	d_z\\i:		// jī		(obsolete)
	ぢー	d_z\\i:		// jī		(obsolete)
	ぢ (L21	d_z\\		// j([auo]	(obsolete)
	ちぇ	t_s\\e		// che
	ちぇー	t_s\\e:		// chē
	ぢぇ	d_z\\e		// je		(obsolete)
	ぢぇー	d_z\\e:		// jē		(obsolete)

.group つ
	つ	t_su		// tsu
	つう	t_su:	// tsū
	つぅ	t_su:	// tsū
	つー	t_su:	// tsū
	づ	zu		// zu
	づう	zu:		// zū
	づぅ	zu:		// zū
	づー	zu:		// zū
	つぁ	t_sa		// tsa
	つぁー	t_sa:		// tsā
	つぃ	t_swi		// tswi
	つぃー	t_swi:		// tswī
	つぇ	t_se		// tse
	つぇー	t_se:		// tsē
	つぉ	t_so		// tso
	つぉー	t_so:		// tsō
	づぁ	za		// za
	づぁー	za:		// zā
	づぃ	d_z\\i		// ji
	づぃー	d_z\\i:		// jī
	づぇ	ze		// ze
	づぇー	ze:		// zē
	づぉ	zo		// zo
	づぉー	zo:		// zō
